NodeJsProjects/SpellChecker/Dictionaries/lv_LV/lv_LV.aff
SFX 8 Y 116
SFX 8 t   u       [^eīps]t
SFX 8 t   i       [^eīgkps]t
SFX 8 t   0       [^eīps]t
SFX 8 t   am      [^eīps]t
SFX 8 t   at      [^eīps]t
SFX 8 t   iet     [^gkeīps]t
SFX 8 t   ot      [^eīps]t
SFX 8 t   u       [e]pt
SFX 8 t   i       [e]pt
SFX 8 t   0       [e]pt
SFX 8 t   am      [e]pt
SFX 8 t   at      [e]pt
SFX 8 t   iet     [e]pt
SFX 8 t   ot      [e]pt
SFX 8 upt   ūpu     [u]pt
SFX 8 upt   ūpi     [u]pt
SFX 8 upt   ūp      [u]pt
SFX 8 upt   ūpam    [u]pt
SFX 8 upt   ūpat    [u]pt
SFX 8 upt   ūpiet   [u]pt
SFX 8 upt   ūpot    [u]pt
SFX 8 t   u       [^aēiu]st
SFX 8 t   0       [^aēiu]st
SFX 8 t   am      [^aēiu]st
SFX 8 t   at      [^aēiu]st
SFX 8 t   iet     [^aēiu]st
SFX 8 t   ot      [^aēiu]st
SFX 8 ast   otu       [a]st
SFX 8 ast   oti       [a]st
SFX 8 ast   ot        [a]st
SFX 8 ast   otam      [a]st
SFX 8 ast   otat      [a]st
SFX 8 ast   otiet     [a]st
SFX 8 ast   otot      [a]st
SFX 8 st   du       [ē]st
SFX 8 st   d        [ē]st
SFX 8 st   dam      [ē]st
SFX 8 st   dat      [ē]st
SFX 8 st   diet     [ē]st
SFX 8 st   dot      [ē]st
SFX 8 st   edu       [ģ]ist
SFX 8 st   edi       [ģ]ist
SFX 8 st   ed        [ģ]ist
SFX 8 st   edam      [ģ]ist
SFX 8 st   edat      [ģ]ist
SFX 8 st   ediet     [ģ]ist
SFX 8 st   edot      [ģ]ist
SFX 8 st   etu       [ķ]ist
SFX 8 st   eti       [ķ]ist
SFX 8 st   et        [ķ]ist
SFX 8 st   etam      [ķ]ist
SFX 8 st   etat      [ķ]ist
SFX 8 st   etiet     [ķ]ist
SFX 8 st   etot      [ķ]ist
SFX 8 ist   ītu       [n]ist
SFX 8 ist   īti       [n]ist
SFX 8 ist   īt        [n]ist
SFX 8 ist   ītam      [n]ist
SFX 8 ist   ītat      [n]ist
SFX 8 ist   ītiet     [n]ist
SFX 8 ist   ītot      [n]ist
SFX 8 st   enu       [r]ist
SFX 8 st   en        [r]ist
SFX 8 st   enam      [r]ist
SFX 8 st   enat      [r]ist
SFX 8 st   eniet     [r]ist
SFX 8 st   enot      [r]ist
SFX 8 ust   ūtu       [j]ust
SFX 8 ust   ūti       [j]ust
SFX 8 ust   ūt        [j]ust
SFX 8 ust   ūtam      [j]ust
SFX 8 ust   ūtat      [j]ust
SFX 8 ust   ūtiet     [j]ust
SFX 8 ust   ūtot      [j]ust
SFX 8 ust   ūstu       [k]ust
SFX 8 ust   ūsti       [k]ust
SFX 8 ust   ūst        [k]ust
SFX 8 ust   ūstam      [k]ust
SFX 8 ust   ūstat      [k]ust
SFX 8 ust   ūstiet     [k]ust
SFX 8 ust   ūstot      [k]ust
SFX 8 ust   ūdu       [z]ust
SFX 8 ust   ūdi       [z]ust
SFX 8 ust   ūd        [z]ust
SFX 8 ust   ūdam      [z]ust
SFX 8 ust   ūdat      [z]ust
SFX 8 ust   ūdiet     [z]ust
SFX 8 ust   ūdot      [z]ust
SFX 8 gt  dz       [g]t
SFX 8 gt  dziet    [g]t
SFX 8 kt  c       [k]t
SFX 8 kt  ciet    [k]t
SFX 8 iet  eju      [i]et
SFX 8 iet  ej       [i]et
SFX 8 iet  ejam     [i]et
SFX 8 iet  ejat     [i]et
SFX 8 iet  ejiet    [i]et
SFX 8 iet  ejot     [i]et
SFX 8 īt  inu     [^rvz]īt
SFX 8 īt  in      [^rvz]īt
SFX 8 īt  inam    [^rvz]īt
SFX 8 īt  inat    [^rvz]īt
SFX 8 īt  iniet   [^rvz]īt
SFX 8 īt  inot    [^rvz]īt
SFX 8 īt  iju      [rv]īt
SFX 8 īt  ij       [rv]īt
SFX 8 īt  ijam     [rv]īt
SFX 8 īt  ijat     [rv]īt
SFX 8 īt  ijiet    [rv]īt
SFX 8 īt  ijot     [rv]īt
SFX 8 īt  enu      [d]zīt
SFX 8 īt  en       [d]zīt
SFX 8 īt  enam     [d]zīt
SFX 8 īt  enat     [d]zīt
SFX 8 īt  eniet    [d]zīt
SFX 8 īt  enot     [d]zīt

SFX 6 Y 64
SFX 6   t     ju     [āēubmp]t
SFX 6   t     0      [bmp]t
SFX 6   t     j      [āēubmp]t
SFX 6   t     jam    [āēubmp]t
SFX 6   t     jat    [āēubmp]t
SFX 6   t     jot    [āēubmp]t
SFX 6   t     jiet  [āēu]t
SFX 6   t     iet   [bmp]t
SFX 6   gt    dzu     [g]t
SFX 6   gt    dz      [g]t
SFX 6   gt    dzam    [g]t
SFX 6   gt    dzat    [g]t
SFX 6   gt    dzot    [g]t
SFX 6   gt    dziet   [g]t
SFX 6   kt    cu     [k]t
SFX 6   kt    c      [k]t
SFX 6   kt    cam    [k]t
SFX 6   kt    cat    [k]t
SFX 6   kt    cot    [k]t
SFX 6   kt    ciet   [k]t
SFX 6   ūt    uju     [ū]t
SFX 6   ūt    uj      [ū]t
SFX 6   ūt    ujam    [ū]t
SFX 6   ūt    ujat    [ū]t
SFX 6   ūt    ujot    [ū]t
SFX 6   ūt    ujiet   [ū]t
SFX 6   zt    žu     [z]t
SFX 6   t     0      [z]t
SFX 6   zt    ž      [z]t
SFX 6   zt    žam    [z]t
SFX 6   zt    žat    [z]t
SFX 6   zt    žot    [z]t
SFX 6   st    žu     [s]t
SFX 6   st    d      [s]t
SFX 6   st    ž      [s]t
SFX 6   st    žam    [s]t
SFX 6   st    žat    [s]t
SFX 6   st    žot    [s]t
SFX 6   st    diet   [s]t
SFX 6   t     iet     [lz]t
SFX 6   lt    ļu      [l]t
SFX 6   t     0       [l]t
SFX 6   lt    ļ       [l]t
SFX 6   lt    ļam     [l]t
SFX 6   lt    ļat     [l]t
SFX 6   lt    ļot     [l]t
SFX 6   t     u      [^āē][r]t
SFX 6   t     0      [^āē][r]t
SFX 6   t     am     [^āē][r]t
SFX 6   t     at     [^āē][r]t
SFX 6   t     iet    [^āē][r]t
SFX 6   t     ot     [^āē][r]t
SFX 6   ārt   aru     [ā]rt
SFX 6   ārt   ar      [ā]rt
SFX 6   ārt   aram    [ā]rt
SFX 6   ārt   arat    [ā]rt
SFX 6   ārt   arot    [ā]rt
SFX 6   ārt   ariet   [ā]rt
SFX 6   ērt   eru    [ē]rt
SFX 6   ērt   er     [ē]rt
SFX 6   ērt   eram   [ē]rt
SFX 6   ērt   erat   [ē]rt
SFX 6   ērt   erot   [ē]rt
SFX 6   ērt   eriet  [ē]rt

SFX 2 Y 92
SFX 2   st   žošs     [s]t
SFX 2   st   žoša     [s]t
SFX 2   st   žošam    [s]t
SFX 2   st   žošu     [s]t
SFX 2   st   žošā     [s]t
SFX 2   st   žošas    [s]t
SFX 2   st   žošai    [s]t
SFX 2   st   žoši     [s]t
SFX 2   st   žošiem   [s]t
SFX 2   st   žošus    [s]t
SFX 2   st   žošos    [s]t
SFX 2   st   žošām    [s]t
SFX 2   st   žošās    [s]t
SFX 2   st   žošais   [s]t
SFX 2   st   žošajam  [s]t
SFX 2   st   žošo     [s]t
SFX 2   st   žošajā   [s]t
SFX 2   st   žošajai  [s]t
SFX 2   st   žošie    [s]t
SFX 2   st   žošajiem [s]t
SFX 2   st   žošajos  [s]t
SFX 2   st   žošajām  [s]t
SFX 2   st   žošajās  [s]t
SFX 2   st   žams     [s]t
SFX 2   st   žama     [s]t
SFX 2   st   žamam    [s]t
SFX 2   st   žamu     [s]t
SFX 2   st   žamā     [s]t
SFX 2   st   žamas    [s]t
SFX 2   st   žamai    [s]t
SFX 2   st   žami     [s]t
SFX 2   st   žamiem   [s]t
SFX 2   st   žamus    [s]t
SFX 2   st   žamos    [s]t
SFX 2   st   žamām    [s]t
SFX 2   st   žamās    [s]t
SFX 2   st   žamais   [s]t
SFX 2   st   žamajam  [s]t
SFX 2   st   žamo     [s]t
SFX 2   st   žamajā   [s]t
SFX 2   st   žamajai  [s]t
SFX 2   st   žamie    [s]t
SFX 2   st   žamajiem [s]t
SFX 2   st   žamajos  [s]t
SFX 2   st   žamajām  [s]t
SFX 2   st   žamajās  [s]t
SFX 2  zt   žošs     [z]t
SFX 2  zt   žoša     [z]t
SFX 2  zt   žošam    [z]t
SFX 2  zt   žošu     [z]t
SFX 2  zt   žošā     [z]t
SFX 2  zt   žošas    [z]t
SFX 2  zt   žošai    [z]t
SFX 2  zt   žoši     [z]t
SFX 2  zt   žošiem   [z]t
SFX 2  zt   žošus    [z]t
SFX 2  zt   žošos    [z]t
SFX 2  zt   žošām    [z]t
SFX 2  zt   žošās    [z]t
SFX 2  zt   žošais   [z]t
SFX 2  zt   žošajam  [z]t
SFX 2  zt   žošo     [z]t
SFX 2  zt   žošajā   [z]t
SFX 2  zt   žošajai  [z]t
SFX 2  zt   žošie    [z]t
SFX 2  zt   žošajiem [z]t
SFX 2  zt   žošajos  [z]t
SFX 2  zt   žošajām  [z]t
SFX 2  zt   žošajās  [z]t
SFX 2  zt   žams     [z]t
SFX 2  zt   žama     [z]t
SFX 2  zt   žamam    [z]t
SFX 2  zt   žamu     [z]t
SFX 2  zt   žamā     [z]t
SFX 2  zt   žamas    [z]t
SFX 2  zt   žamai    [z]t
SFX 2  zt   žami     [z]t
SFX 2  zt   žamiem   [z]t
SFX 2  zt   žamus    [z]t
SFX 2  zt   žamos    [z]t
SFX 2  zt   žamām    [z]t
SFX 2  zt   žamās    [z]t
SFX 2  zt   žamais   [z]t
SFX 2  zt   žamajam  [z]t
SFX 2  zt   žamo     [z]t
SFX 2  zt   žamajā   [z]t
SFX 2  zt   žamajai  [z]t
SFX 2  zt   žamie    [z]t
SFX 2  zt   žamajiem [z]t
SFX 2  zt   žamajos  [z]t
SFX 2  zt   žamajām  [z]t
SFX 2  zt   žamajās  [z]t
